Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 11
MOBILE HOME PARKS

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in HB 19-1309, see section 1 of chapter 281, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

31-15-1101. Mobile home parks - definition.

The governing body of any municipality has the power to adopt, administer, and enforce ordinances and resolutions to provide for the safe and equitable operation of mobile home parks throughout the municipality. These ordinances and resolutions may be enacted within the scope of the "Mobile Home Park Act", part 2 of article 12 of title 38, and further as the municipality deems necessary to protect home owners' equity in the safe use and enjoyment of the mobile homes and mobile home lots, including but not limited to the imposition of penalties or adoption of a local registration system.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an ordinance or resolution enacted by a municipality's governing body is only enforceable within the municipality.

One or more contiguous counties and any municipality or town within each county may enter into intergovernmental agreements to extend the applicability of any ordinance or resolution adopted under this section to and throughout any participating county, municipality, or town.

For purposes of this part 11, "home owner", "landlord", "mobile home", "mobile home lot", and "mobile home park" have the same meaning as they are defined in section 38-12-201.5.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1309), ch. 281, p. 2628, § 4, effective May 23.